Mississippi statutes. Title 93. Domestic Relations
Wards, Generally

§ 93-13-1.
Parental guardianship of minor children.

The father and mother are the joint natural guardians of their minor children and are equally charged with their care, nurture, welfare and education, and the care and management of their estates. The father and mother shall have equal powers and rights, and neither parent has any right paramount to the right of the other concerning the custody of the minor or the control of the services or the earnings of such minor, or any other matter affecting the minor. If either father or mother die or be incapable of acting, the guardianship devolves upon the surviving parent. Neither parent shall forcibly take a child from the guardianship of the parent legally entitled to its custody. But if any father or mother be unsuitable to discharge the duties of guardianship, then the court, or chancellor in vacation, may appoint some suitable person, or having appointed the father or mother, may remove him or her if it appear that such person is unsuitable, and appoint a suitable person.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 1863; 1942, § 399; Laws, 1922, ch. 266.

§ 93-13-2.
Civil liability of parents for damages resulting from malicious and willful acts of certain minor children.

Any property owner shall be entitled to recover damages in an amount not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), plus necessary court costs, from the parents of any minor under the age of eighteen (18) years and over the age of ten (10), who maliciously and willfully damages or destroys property belonging to such owner. However, this section shall not apply to parents whose parental custody and control of such child have been removed by court order or decree.

The action authorized in this section shall be in addition to all other actions which the owner is entitled to maintain and nothing in this section shall preclude recovery in a greater amount from the minor or from any person, including the parents, for damages to which such minor or other person would otherwise be liable.

It is the purpose of this section to authorize recovery from parents in situations where they are not otherwise liable and to limit the amount of recovery. The provisions of this section shall apply only to acts committed on and after July 1, 1978.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 492, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 370, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 508, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 93-13-7.
Testamentary guardians; appointment [Repealed effective January 1, 2020].

Any parent, even though under twenty-one (21) years of age, may, by an instrument to take effect at the parent’s death and wholly written and signed by him or her, or attested by two (2) or more credible witnesses, not including the person appointed as guardian, if not so written, appoint some suitable person as guardian of his motherless or her fatherless child that has not been married, though the child be then unborn and though the child be under some legal disability other than or in addition to minority. Such parent may by such an instrument waive the furnishing by the guardian of bond, inventory and accounting, subject to the approval of the court.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch 36, art. 1(122); 1857, ch. 60, art. 140; 1871, § 1203; 1880, § 2095; 1892, § 2184; 1906, § 2401; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1962; 1930, § 1866; 1942, § 402; Laws, 1972, ch. 408, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1972; repealed by Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 11, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-13-17.
Bond and oath of guardian.

Every guardian, before he shall have authority to act, shall, unless security be dispensed with by will or writing or as hereinafter provided, enter into bond payable to the state, in such penalty and with such sureties as the court may require; and the bond shall be recorded and may be put in suit for any breach of the condition, whether the appointment be legal or not; and the condition shall be as follows:

“The condition of the above obligation is that if the above bound_______________ , as guardian of_______________ , of_______________County, shall faithfully discharge all the duties required of him by law, then the above obligation shall cease.”

And the guardian shall also take and subscribe an oath, at or prior to the time of his appointment, faithfully to discharge the duties of guardian of the ward according to law.

A guardian need not enter into bond, however, as to such part of the assets of the ward’s estate as may, pursuant to an order of the court in its discretion, be deposited in any one or more banking corporations, building and loan associations or savings and loan associations in this state so long as such deposits are fully insured, such deposits there to remain until the further order of the court, and a certified copy of the order for deposit having been furnished the depository or depositories and its receipt acknowledged.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 36, art. 1(126); 1857, ch. 60, art. 143; 1871, §§ 1206, 1208; 1880, § 2098; 1892, § 2187; 1906, § 2404; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1965; 1930, § 1869; 1942, § 405; Laws, 1972, ch. 408, § 7; Laws, 1987, ch. 368; Laws, 2001, ch. 422, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 93-13-38.
General duties and powers of guardians [Repealed effective January 1, 2020].

All the provisions of the law on the subject of executors and administrators, relating to settlement or disposition of property limitations, notice to creditors, probate and registration of claims, proceedings to insolvency and distribution of assets of insolvent estates, shall, as far as applicable and not otherwise provided, be observed and enforced in a guardianship of the person and estate. The requirements in a guardianship of the person are modified to the extent that notice to creditors is not required, reports will be made only as often as the court requires, and the guardianship may be closed without the need for any accounting unless otherwise determined by the court. Any assets that are received shall be reported immediately and at that point the guardianship shall be deemed to be a guardianship of the person and estate and all requirements for guardianship of the person and estate shall be followed.

It shall be the duty of the guardian of wards as defined by Section 1-3-58, Mississippi Code of 1972, to improve the estate committed to his charge, and to apply so much of the income, profit or body thereof as may be necessary for the comfortable maintenance and support of the ward and of his family, if he have any, after obtaining an order of the court fixing the amount. And such guardian may be authorized by the court or chancellor to purchase on behalf of and in the name of the ward with any funds of such ward’s estate sufficient and appropriate property for a home for such ward or his family on five (5) days’ notice to a member of said family, or the necessary funds may be borrowed and the property purchased given as security. The guardian is empowered to collect and sue for and recover all debts due his said ward, and shall make payment of his debts out of the personal estate as executors and administrators discharge debts out of the estate of decedents, but the exempt property of the ward shall not be liable for debts, and no debts against such estate shall be payable by such guardian unless first probated and registered, as required of claims against the estate of decedent.

The word “family” shall be taken for the purpose of this section to mean husband or wife and children; if there be no husband, wife or children, the father and mother; and if there be no father or mother, then the grandfather and grandmother, sisters and brothers of said ward.

On application of the guardian or any interested party, and after notice to all interested persons and to such other persons as the court may direct, and on a showing that the ward will probably remain incompetent during his lifetime, the court may, after hearing and by order, authorize the guardian to apply such principal or income of the ward’s estate as is not required for the support of the ward during his lifetime or of his family towards the establishment of an estate plan for the purpose of minimizing income, estate, inheritance, or other taxes payable out of the ward’s estate. The court may authorize the guardian to make gifts of the ward’s personal property or real estate, outright or in trust, on behalf of the ward, to or for the benefit of (i) organizations to which charitable contributions may be made under the Internal Revenue Code and in which it is shown the ward would reasonably have an interest, (ii) the ward’s heirs at law who are identifiable at the time of the order, (iii) devisees under the ward’s last validly executed will, if there be such a will, and (iv) a person serving as guardian of the ward provided he is eligible under either category (ii) or (iii) above.

The person making application to the court shall outline the proposed estate plan, setting forth all the benefits to be derived therefrom. The application shall also indicate that the planned disposition is consistent with the intentions of the ward insofar as they can be ascertained. If the ward’s intentions cannot be ascertained, the ward will be presumed to favor reduction in the incidence of the various forms of taxation and the partial distribution of his estate as herein provided.

The court:

Shall appoint a guardian ad litem for the ward; and

May appoint a guardian ad litem for any interested party at any stage of the proceedings, if deemed advisable for the protection of the interested party.

Subsequent modifications of an approved plan may be made by similar application to the court.

Before signing an order to effectuate the provisions of this subsection (4), the chancellor shall review the ward’s will, if the will is known or can be produced, to determine that a gift made under this subsection (4) is consistent with the will.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 36, art. 1(136, 137); 1857, ch. 60, arts. 155, 156; 1871, §§ 1242, 1244; 1880, §§ 2119, 2120; 1892, §§ 2219, 2220; 1906, §§ 2437, 2438; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 1998, 1999; 1930, §§ 1902, 1903; 1942, §§ 439, 440; Laws, 1896, ch. 97; Laws, 1924, ch. 164; Laws, 1938, ch. 271; Laws, 1960, chs. 217, 218; Laws, 1972, ch. 408, §§ 15, 16; Laws, 1996, ch. 462, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 554, § 1, eff from and after July 2, 2013; repealed by Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 11, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-13-41.
Care of real estate [Repealed effective January 1, 2020]

A guardian shall not commit waste on the real estate of his ward. A guardian having real estate under his care may either cultivate the same with the stock and implements belonging to his ward, or to be purchased by the order of the court or chancellor in vacation, with the money of the ward, or lease the same from year to year, or for a term not exceeding three (3) years if the ward will not sooner be of age; but upon application and proper showing made to the court or chancellor in vacation, a guardian may be allowed to lease said real estate for such longer time as may be shown to be advantageous to said estate; in no case, however, to extend beyond the majority of the ward, nor in any case to exceed six (6) years.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 36, art. 1(130); 1857, ch. 60, art. 149; 1871, § 1219; 1880, § 2108; 1892, § 2202; 1906, § 2418; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1979; 1930, § 1878; 1942, § 414; Laws, 1896, ch. 95; Laws, 1930, ch. 38; Laws, 1972, ch. 408, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1972; repealed by Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 11, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-13-51.
Sale of land; title validated [Repealed effective January 1, 2020]

When it would be for the personal best interest of the ward or advantageous to his estate to sell a part or the whole of his real estate, including timber or wood, the guardian may present a petition to the court for that purpose, setting forth the reasons why the proposed sale would be beneficial to the ward, and a summons shall issue as provided in Section 93-13-281. If the process be served, or if the petition be joined in by that person or those persons prescribed by Section 93-13-281, or if the guardian ad litem appointed by the court answer within the time fixed, the court shall examine the allegations of and evidence introduced by the guardian, and also the objections and evidence of those, if any, who may appear and object. If on the hearing, the court be satisfied that the interest of the ward will be promoted by the proposed sale, it may decree a sale, and prescribe the terms and conditions thereof, and the notice which shall be requisite, and may require the guardian of said ward or the clerk or commissioner of said court to execute the deed of conveyance to the purchaser of the land, timber or wood sold and require the guardian, clerk or commissioner to give an additional bond, if necessary, faithfully to account for the proceeds.

The sole compensation of the guardian, clerk or commissioner for executing the deed as herein provided shall be Three Dollars ($3.00), which sum may be taxed as a part of the cost of such proceedings.

Provided, however, in event the petition be joined in by that person or those persons prescribed by Section 93-13-281, the notice and summons, as herein provided, shall not be required and said matter shall be proceeded with ex parte.

The title to any real estate heretofore sold, the proceedings therein having been followed in conformity with the provisions of this section, are hereby validated; and no title derived from the real estate of a ward shall be held invalid if the procedure herein contained has been conformed with.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 36, art. 1(132); 1857, ch. 60, art. 151; 1871, § 1221; 1880, § 2113; 1892, § 2205; 1906, § 2422; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1983; 1930, § 1883; 1942, § 419; Laws, 1940, ch. 250; Laws, 1946, ch. 415, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1972, ch. 408, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1972; repealed by Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 11, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-13-73.
Vouchers; production for inspection [Repealed effective January 1, 2020]

In every case where, under the provisions of this chapter, the filing of vouchers is not required, but the court requires that vouchers be produced for examination and inspection, it shall be a sufficient compliance with the provisions of this chapter if the fiduciary produces and exhibits on a hearing of the account pertinent papers or records substantiating every item of disbursement and the amount thereof. Such papers shall not be lodged of record with the clerk, but may be withdrawn by the fiduciary at the conclusion of the hearing thereon. The court, in its discretion, may require such fiduciary to file such substantiating papers or records, or suitable copies thereof, as the court deems necessary for purposes of record.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 426.5; Laws, 1960, ch. 217, § 11; repealed by Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 11, eff from and after January 1, 2020.